California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Except as provided in Section 7602 every common carrier by railroad operating within this State shall maintain, on what is known as passing track sidings, a signboard in connection with each derailing switch or other derailing device, whether the derailer is operated where located or from a distance. The signboard shall be placed within 100 feet of the derailer and shall be constructed in either of two forms, viz: board five feet high and 10 inches wide, or sign constructed of two parts, one of which is an upright and the other a transverse board, the upright to be of sufficient height to securely fasten at the top thereof the transverse board, which shall be not less than
 two feet three inches long and seven inches wide and placed in such a manner that the upper side of the transverse board is not less than four feet above the ties. The board shall have painted thereon the word “derail” in large black letters on a white background.

The commission shall enforce this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7602.

Section 7601 does not apply to any track, siding, spur, or other track owned by private persons for their own use, except when the track, siding, spur, or other track is operated regularly in connection with the line of a common carrier for certain periods, in which case Section 7601 does apply. Section 7601 does not apply to the placing of signboards in places where physical conditions of track will not permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7603.

Any corporation, company, or person, or any officer, superintendent, manager, or other agent thereof, who violates any of the provisions of Sections 7601 or 7602, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense. Any failure, refusal, or neglect to provide any such signboard at any derailing switch or other derailing device constitutes a separate offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7604.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a bell, siren, horn, whistle, or similar audible warning device shall be sounded at any public crossing in accordance with Section 222.21 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a bell, siren, horn, whistle, or similar audible warning device shall be sounded, consistent with paragraph (1), at all rail crossings not subject to the requirements of Subpart B
 (commencing with Section 222.21) of Part 222 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A bell, siren, horn, whistle, or similar audible warning device shall not be sounded in those areas established as quiet zones pursuant to Subpart C (commencing with Section 222.33) of Part 222 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) This section does not restrict the use of a bell, siren, horn, whistle, or similar audible warning device during an emergency or other situation authorized in Section 222.23 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Any railroad corporation violating this section shall be subject to a penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for every violation. The penalty may be recovered in an action prosecuted by the district attorney of the proper county, for the use of
 the state. The corporation is also liable for all damages sustained by any person, and caused by its locomotives, train, or cars, when the provisions of this section are not complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 885, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7605.

Every railroad corporation, or receiver or lessee thereof, operating any line of railroad in this State by steam locomotives, shall equip all steam locomotives used or to be used in the hauling or propelling of trains over the railroad with a bell ringer apparatus or device which, when set in operation, will ring and continue to ring the locomotive bell automatically, and which is so constructed that it may be set in operation from either or both sides of the locomotive cab.

Any railroad company, receiver or lessee thereof, operating any line of railroad within this State by steam locomotives, violating this section shall be
 punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7606.

Every steam locomotive used upon a railroad in this State, carrying passengers or freight for hire, shall be equipped with one or more water glasses of the type known as the “solid water glass,” the same being a solid piece of glass with open flutings at the back thereof, which flutings will permit the raising and falling of water in the boiler of the locomotive to be plainly visible from each side of the cab without the use of a reflector. The glass shall not be less than seven inches in length and one and one-quarter inches in width, and five-eighths of an inch in thickness.

Any person, firm, or corporation operating any such
 steam locomotive which is not equipped with one or more water glasses as described in this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7607.

Every railroad corporation, or receiver or lessee thereof, operating any line of railroad in this State, shall equip all locomotive engines used in the transportation of trains over the railroad with electric or other headlights which will project sufficient light to enable the locomotive engineer to observe clearly a dark object the size of an average man, at a distance of not less than 800 feet on a dark, clear night while his train is running at a rate of speed not less than 30 miles per hour.

This section shall not apply to locomotive engines regularly used in the switching of cars or trains or used exclusively between sun up
 and sun down, or going to or from repair shops when ordered in for repairs, nor to locomotive engines used on short lines or local lines where in the judgment of the commission, the headlight required by this section is not necessary for the preservation of public safety.

Any railroad company, or receiver or lessee thereof, who violates this section, is liable to the State for a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), for each offense. Suit shall be brought to recover the penalty in a court of competent jurisdiction, in the name of the people of the State of California, by the Attorney General or by the district attorney of any county in or through which the railroad is operated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7608.

Every railroad company, or the receiver or receivers of any railroad, operating trains within this state, shall provide a first aid kit containing written instructions for the use of its contents, on each train or light engine, however propelled, for first aid to persons who may be injured in the course of the operation of the train.

The contents of every first aid kit shall be prescribed or approved by the Public Utilities Commission.

The employee of the railroad in charge of the train or engine, however propelled, shall report to the office designated by the company whenever any first
 aid kit has been opened for use.

Any railroad company, or the receiver or receivers, or employee of a railroad company, who fails to comply with this section is liable to a penalty of not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25), and each day’s violation shall constitute a separate offense, except that the railroad company, or receiver or receivers, shall be allowed not to exceed three days without penalty to replace any item after the use of the item has been reported by the employees in charge of the train or engine, however propelled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

7609.

Every railroad company, or the receiver or receivers thereof, operating trains in whole or in part within this State, shall provide an emergency first-aid kit on each caboose, locomotive, motor or diesel engine. The emergency first-aid kit shall be used only to render first medical or surgical aid to injured passengers, employees, or other injured persons requiring such aid at the first possible moment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 561.)
-------------------------------------------

7610.

The employee of any railroad company, or the receiver or receivers thereof, having charge of any passenger train, caboose, locomotive, motor or diesel engine shall report in writing as soon as possible to the office or officer designated by the company or receiver for such purpose, whenever any emergency first-aid kit has been used or has been found missing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 561.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.

Any person or any employee of any railroad company, or the receiver or receivers thereof, who removes, carries away from its proper place, or uses any emergency first-aid kit, except for the purpose of administering first aid in the event of injury to any passenger, employee, or other person, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 359.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within the boundaries of the State of California and engaged in the business of common carrier to operate for or transport its employees in a rail track motor car which is not equipped with a transparent windshield sufficient in width and height to reasonably protect said employees, which said windshield shall be of plastic or safety glass and such car shall also be equipped with an electric headlamp of sufficient candle power as to render visible at a distance of 300 feet in advance of such car under ordinary atmospheric conditions, any obstruction, landmark, warning sign or grade crossing on
 such railroad, and said car shall also be equipped with at least one electric light on the rear end thereof with sufficient candle power as to be visible at a distance of 300 feet under ordinary atmospheric conditions, and such car shall also be equipped with a suitable device that will remove rain, snow and sleet from the windshield on such car. The head and rear lights provided for in this section shall only be required in the hours between one-half hour before sunset and one-half hour after sunrise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1340.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.

On and after July 1, 1954, any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within this State as a common carrier of persons or property or both, for compensation, which either operates for its employees, or which furnishes to its employees for their transportation to or from the place or places where they are required to labor, a rail track motor car that has not been fully equipped as required by Section 7612 of this code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, that any common carrier that has not been able to equip its railroad track motor cars as required by the provisions of said section on or before July 1, 1954, may apply to the Public Utilities Commission
 for additional time. Upon good cause shown, the Public Utilities Commission is hereby authorized to grant additional time by order to any owner or operator of a common carrier by railroad in which to equip such cars, not to exceed one year from July 1, 1954. When such an order has been granted by said Public Utilities Commission to such carrier, the provisions of this section penalizing such rail carrier which has not so equipped its cars shall not be applicable during the period granted to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1340.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within the boundaries of the State of California and engaged in the business of common carrier to operate for or transport the public or its employees in a caboose which is not provided with flush-type toilet facilities, or chemical type toilet facilities approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fences [7626. - 7631.]

7626.

Every railroad corporation shall make and maintain a good and sufficient fence on both sides of its track and property. If it does not and if its engine or cars kill or maim any cattle or other domestic animals upon its line of road, except where the road runs through or upon public land it shall pay to the owner of the cattle or other domestic animals a fair market price for them, unless the killing or maiming occurred through the neglect or fault of the owner of the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7627.

A railroad corporation that pays to the owner of the land through or along which its road is located an agreed price for making and maintaining a good and sufficient fence, or that pays the cost of such fence with the award of damages allowed for the right of way for the railroad, is relieved and exonerated from all claims for damages arising out of the killing or maiming of any animals of persons who thus fail to construct and maintain the fence. The owners of such animals are responsible for any damages or loss which may accrue to the corporation from the animals being upon its railroad track as a result of the nonconstruction of such fence, unless it is shown that the
 loss or damage occurred through the negligence or fault of the corporation, its officers, agents, or employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7628.

The commission may require every railroad corporation operating any steam or electric railroad in this State to erect and maintain lawful fences on each or either side of the railroad where the railroad runs through or upon lands of the United States or of this State, at such places as the commission determines that such fences are necessary to protect cattle, horses, or mules, or any other domestic animal being ranged or grazed upon lands adjacent to the railroad from being maimed or killed by the operation or management of engines, cars, or other rolling stock upon or over the railroad, with necessary openings and gates in the fences, and crossings and cattle guards for
 such openings and gates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7629.

The authority of the commission to require such fences shall be exercised in each instance only when a verified application is filed with the commission by the person or persons owning cattle, horses, mules, or other domestic animals with the right or privilege to range or graze them upon the lands adjacent to the portion of the railroad sought to be fenced.

The application shall specify the ownership of the railroad sought to be fenced, and shall set forth a sufficient description of the lands to identify them, the agency or department of government administering the lands, and the nature of the right or privilege of each
 petitioner to range or graze domestic animals thereon.

Upon the filing of the application, notice thereof and of any hearing by the commission thereon shall be given by mail by the commission to the agency or department of government administering the land, and to the railroad corporation owning or operating the railroad. Such owners, agency or department, and the railroad may protest the granting of the application and may be heard thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7630.

Upon hearing the commission shall determine whether or not any fence or fences are necessary to protect cattle, horses, mules, or any other domestic animals being ranged or grazed upon the land designated in the application, from being maimed, or killed by the operation or management of engines, cars, or other rolling stock upon the railroad, and shall order that a fence or fences be constructed and maintained by the railroad corporation at such places along the railroad adjacent to the lands designated in the petition as the commission determines. The commission may fix the time within which the fence or fences shall be constructed and may designate the places for
 necessary openings and gates therein and crossings and cattle guards in connection therewith.

The commission may modify or revoke any such order when it determines that the necessity for any such fence has ceased to exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7631.

The failure of any railroad corporation to comply with any order of the commission authorized by this article shall not subject it, or any of its officers, agents, or employees, to any penalty other than payment by the railroad corporation to the owner of the maimed or killed cattle, or other domestic animals of a fair market price for the animals.

Nothing in this article requires a railroad corporation to pay for the maiming or killing of any cattle or domestic animals where the maiming or killing resulted from the neglect or fault of the owner of the animals.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Operation [7653. - 7663.]

7653.

Every railroad corporation shall furnish, on the inside of its passenger cars, sufficient room and accommodations for all passengers to whom tickets are sold for any one trip, and for all persons presenting tickets entitling them to travel thereon. When fare is taken for transporting passengers on any baggage, wood, gravel, or freight car, the same care shall be taken and the same responsibility is assumed by the corporation as for passengers on passenger cars.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7654.

Every railroad corporation shall print and conspicuously post on the inside of its passenger cars its rules and regulations regarding fare and conduct of its passengers. In case any passenger is injured on or from the platform of a car, or on any baggage, wood, gravel, or freight car, in violation of such printed regulations, or in violation of positive verbal instructions or injunctions given to the passenger in person by any officer of the train, the corporation is not responsible for damages for the injuries, unless the corporation has failed to comply with the provisions of Section 7653.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7655.

A check shall be affixed to every package or parcel of baggage when taken for transportation by any agent or employee of a railroad corporation and a duplicate thereof given to the passenger or person delivering the baggage. If the check is refused on demand, the railroad corporation shall pay to the passenger the sum of twenty dollars ($20), to be recovered in an action for damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1022.)
-------------------------------------------

7656.

If any passenger refuses to pay his fare, or to exhibit or surrender his ticket, when reasonably requested to do so, the conductor and employees of the corporation may, on stopping the train, put him and his baggage out of the cars, using no unnecessary force, at any usual stopping place, or near any dwelling house.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7657.

Every conductor, baggage master, engineer, brakeman, or other employee of any railroad corporation, employed on a passenger train or at stations for passengers, shall wear upon his hat or cap, or in some conspicuous place on the breast of his coat, a badge, indicating his office or station, and the initial letters of the name of the corporation by which he is employed. No collector or conductor, without such badge, is authorized to demand or to receive from any passenger any fare, toll, or ticket, or exercise any of the powers of his office or station. No other officer or employee, without such badge, has any authority to meddle or interfere with any passenger or
 property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7658.

No city or county or city and county ordinance which establishes a limit on the speed of trains shall be valid unless that ordinance has been approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 683.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.

Notwithstanding any city or county or city and county ordinance to the contrary, no railroad conductor or engineer, who, while operating a train, obstructs a railroad crossing, shall be subject to any criminal penalty, where he has no control over the situation causing the obstruction, or where the train cannot be moved without endangering the safety of the passengers or freight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

7660.

The commission, in authorizing any restrictions on the speed of rail services, shall do so only upon receipt of evidence and a finding (a) that the restriction is required due to track condition, alignment, curvature of tracks, superelevation, or inadequate right-of-way protection, or any combination thereof, as the case may be, and (b) that higher speeds will have an adverse impact upon the health and safety of the public until the specified conditions are changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

7661.

(a) The commission shall require every railroad corporation operating in this state to develop, within 90 days of the effective date of the act adding this section, in consultation with, and with the approval of, the Office of Emergency Services, a protocol for rapid communications with the Office of Emergency Services, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and designated county public safety agencies in an endangered area if there is a runaway train or any other uncontrolled train movement that threatens public health and safety.

(b) A railroad corporation shall promptly notify the Office of Emergency Services, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and designated county public safety agencies, through
 a communication to the Warning Center of the Office of Emergency Services, if there is a runaway train or any other uncontrolled train movement that threatens public health and safety, in accordance with the railroad corporation’s communications protocol developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The notification required pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include the following information, whether or not an accident or spill occurs:

(1) The information required by subdivision (c) of Section 7673.

(2) In the event of a runaway train, a train list.

(3) In the event of an uncontrolled train movement or uncontrolled movement of railcars, a track list or other inventory document if available.

(d) The division of the commission responsible for railroad safety shall investigate any incident that results in a notification required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 54.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7662.

(a) (1) A railroad corporation shall place appropriate signage to notify an engineer of an approaching grade crossing, consistent with federal law.

(2) Whistle post signs shall be deemed to satisfy this requirement.

(b) (1) Whenever a railroad issues written or verbal instructions to employees that may restrict or stop train movements because of track conditions, structures, persons, or equipment working, appropriate flags that are readily visible and easily recognizable to the crews on both passenger and freight trains shall be displayed as quickly as practicable. Yellow flags shall
 be used for temporary speed restrictions, consistent with paragraphs (2) and (3). Yellow-red flags shall be used, consistent with paragraphs (4) and (5), when a train may be required to stop.

(2) Yellow flags shall be used to warn trains to restrict movement because of track conditions or structures. Except as provided in paragraph (3), a yellow flag shall be displayed two miles before the restricted area in order to ensure that train movement is restricted at the proper location.

(3) When the restricted area is close to a terminal, junction, or another area, the yellow flag may be displayed less than two miles before the restricted area. This information shall be included in the written instructions to employees issued pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Yellow-red flags shall be used to warn trains to be prepared to stop because of persons or equipment working. A yellow-red flag shall be displayed two miles before the restricted area in order to ensure that the train is prepared to stop at the proper location.

(5) When the restricted area is close to a terminal, junction, or other area, the yellow-red flag may be displayed less than two miles before the restricted area. This information shall be included in the written instructions to employees issued pursuant to paragraph (1).

(6) Flags shall be displayed only on the track affected and shall be displayed to the right side of the track as viewed from the approaching train. The flags shall be displayed to protect all possible
 access to the restricted area.

(c) A railroad corporation shall provide milepost markers to train crews at accurate one-mile intervals. The markers shall be readily visible to the locomotive engineer within the locomotive cab, and shall be kept in good repair and replaced when necessary.

(d) A railroad corporation shall place whistle signs to the right of the main track in the direction of approach, exactly one-quarter mile from the entrance to any grade crossing as a point of reference for locomotive engineers who blow the whistle and ring the bell for these grade crossings as a warning to the public. The signs, which shall consist of an “X” or “W” or other identifiable mark or symbol on a square plate mounted on a post, shall be readily visible to a locomotive engineer within the
 locomotive cab, shall be kept in good repair, and shall be replaced when necessary.

(e) A railroad corporation shall place permanent speed signs to the right of the track in the direction of approach, two miles in advance of the point where the speed is either increased or decreased for both passenger and freight trains. The signs shall be readily visible to a locomotive engineer within the locomotive cab, shall be kept in good repair, and shall be replaced when necessary.

(f) A railroad corporation shall notify the commission and the collective bargaining representative of any affected employee of any new utilization of remote control locomotives in the state, on or after January 1, 2007.

(g) A railroad corporation shall
 provide immediate notification to the Office of Emergency Services of accidents, incidents, and other events, concurrent with those provided to the Federal Railroad Administration’s National Response Center, as required by Part 225.9 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 499.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7663.

Whenever the Department of the California Highway Patrol or a designated local public safety agency responds to a railroad accident, the accident shall be reported to the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 500.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.3. Local Community Rail Security Act of 2006 [7665. - 7667.]

7665.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Local Community Rail Security Act of 2006.

(b) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this act is to provide for the security and safety of local communities and local community facilities, to protect local communities from transportation practices that fail to secure rail facilities and equipment from the threat of terrorism, and to ensure proper communication between the owners and operators of rail facilities and
 equipment with local and state first responders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.1.

Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this article:

(a) “Agency” or “office” means the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) “Secretary” or “director” means the Director of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 501.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.2.

By July 1, 2007, every operator of rail facilities shall provide a risk assessment to the commission and the office for each rail facility in the state that is under its ownership, operation, or control. The risk assessment shall, for each rail facility, describe all of the following:

(a) The location and functions of the rail facility.

(b) All types of cargo that are moved through, or stored at, the rail facility.

(c) Any hazardous cargo that is moved through, or stored at, the rail facility.

(d) The frequency
 that any hazardous cargo is moved through, or stored at, the rail facility.

(e) A description of the practices of the rail operator to prevent acts of sabotage, terrorism, or other crimes on the rail facility.

(f) All training programs that the rail operator requires for its employees at the rail facility.

(g) The emergency response procedures of the rail operator to deal with acts of sabotage, terrorism, or other crimes at the rail facility.

(h) The procedures of the rail operator to communicate with local and state law enforcement personnel, emergency personnel, transportation officials, and other first responders, in the event of acts of sabotage, terrorism, or
 other crimes at the rail facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 502.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.3.

The office may provide the risk assessment provided pursuant to Section 7665.2 to other law enforcement or emergency personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 503.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.4.

(a) By January 1, 2008, every rail operator shall develop and implement an infrastructure protection program to protect rail infrastructure in the state from acts of sabotage, terrorism, or other crimes.

(b) (1) The infrastructure protection program shall address the security of all critical infrastructure.

(2) The infrastructure protection program shall provide training to all employees of the rail operator performing work at a rail facility on how to recognize, prevent, and respond to acts of sabotage, terrorism, or other crimes.

(c) (1) All employees of a contractor or subcontractor of a rail operator, and any other person performing work at a rail facility that is not the employee of the rail operator, shall receive training equivalent to that received by employees of the rail operator pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), within a reasonable period of time. The commission, in consultation with the director, may adopt reasonable rules or orders to implement this requirement.

(2) All employees of a contractor or subcontractor of a rail operator, and any other person performing work at a rail facility that is not the employee of the rail operator, shall undergo an equivalent evaluation of their background, skills, and fitness as the rail operator implements for its employees pursuant to its infrastructure protection plan.
 The commission, in consultation with the director, may adopt reasonable rules or orders to implement this requirement.

(d) Each rail operator in the state shall provide to the commission and the director a copy of its infrastructure protection program. Notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, the commission and the director shall keep this information confidential.

(e) The infrastructure protection program shall be updated by the rail operator at least once every year, and the updated plan shall be submitted to the commission and the director.

(f) The commission, in consultation with the office, shall review the infrastructure protection program submitted by a rail
 operator, may conduct inspections to facilitate the review, and may order a rail operator to improve, modify, or change its program to comply with the requirements of this article.

(g) The commission may fine a rail operator for failure to comply with the requirements of this section or an order of the commission pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 401.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.6.

Every rail operator shall, for all facilities that handle hazardous cargo, do all the following:

(a) Secure all facilities that handle or store hazardous materials by providing adequate security personnel.

(b) Store hazardous materials only in secure facilities designed for storage, which shall not include mainline, branch, industrial, or passing tracks not so designed or retrofitted.

(c) Shall not leave locomotive equipment running while unattended, or leave any unattended locomotive equipment unlocked.

(d) Shall ensure that the cabs of occupied locomotives are secured from hijacking, sabotage, or terrorism.

(e) Shall not use remote control locomotives to move hazardous materials over a public crossing unless the remote control operator is able to maintain line-of-sight visibility of the public crossing and visually ensure that all automatic highway-rail grade crossing warning devices are functioning as intended, and it is safe for the train movement to enter the public crossing.

(f) Shall secure remote control devices to prevent access to those devices by unauthorized personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.8.

Every rail operator shall provide communications capability that can accomplish all of the following:

(a) Timely alerting local and state law enforcement personnel, emergency personnel, transportation officials and other first responders in the event of sabotage, terrorism, or other crimes.

(b) Timely provide bridge tenders on moveable bridges the ability to alert local and state law enforcement personnel, emergency personnel,
 transportation officials and other first responders in the event of sabotage, terrorism, or other crimes.

(c) Notify rail workers of the local or national threat level for the rail industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7666.

No rail operator or any other person covered by this article may act to punish an employee who reports a violation of this article. An employee against whom a punitive action is taken may seek civil damages of up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) from any employer that acts to punish an employee who reports a violation of this article, in addition to any other remedies the court deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7667.

The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Hazardous Materials Transportation by Rail [7671. - 7673.]

7671.

The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this article is to protect the health and safety of the public and to improve the safety of transporting hazardous materials by rail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1662, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.

For purposes of this article, “hazardous material” means either of the following:

(a) A hazardous material, as defined in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) A hazardous material, as defined in Section 25501 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.5.

Any railroad corporation which is involved in an incident resulting in a release, or threatened release, of a hazardous material shall immediately report the type and extent of the release or threatened release in the manner specified in Section 25507 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1662, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.

Each railroad corporation which transports hazardous materials in the state shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide a system map of the state to the Office of Emergency Services and to the Public Utilities Commission, showing practical groupings of mileposts on the system and showing mileposts of stations, terminals, junction points, road crossings, and the locations of natural gas and liquid pipelines in railroad rights-of-way.

(b) Annually submit to the Office of Emergency Services a copy of a publication which identifies emergency handling guidelines for the surface transportation of hazardous materials, except that if the railroad
 corporation is classified as a class I carrier by the Interstate Commerce Commission pursuant to Subpart A of Part 1201 of Subchapter C of Chapter X of the Code of Federal Regulations, the railroad corporation shall annually submit to the Office of Emergency Services 50 copies of this publication which the agency shall make available to the Public Utilities Commission and local administering agencies and to other response agencies. These guidelines shall not be considered comprehensive instructions for the handling of any specific incident.

(c) If there is a train incident resulting in a release or an overturned railcar or an impact which threatens a release of a hazardous material, provide the emergency response agency with all of the following information:

(1) A list of each car in
 the train and the order of the cars.

(2) The contents of each car, if loaded, in the train.

(3) Identification of the cars and contents in the train which are involved in the incident, including, but not limited to, those cars which have derailed.
